District of Columbia statutes.
3-1351

Definitions.

For the purposes of this chapter, the term:

(1)

“Commission” means the Motor Vehicle Theft Prevention Commission established by § 3-1352.

(2)

“Fund” means the General Fund of the District of Columbia.

(3)

“Motor vehicle” shall have the same meaning as provided in § 50-1501.01(1).

History

July 18, 2008, D.C. Law 17-197, § 2, 55 DCR 6277
Sept. 14, 2011, D.C. Law 19-21, § 9050(a)(1), 58 DCR 6226

Effect of Amendments

D.C. Law 19-21 substituted “General Fund of the District of Columbia” for “Motor Vehicle Theft Prevention Fund established by § 3-1356”.

Editor's Notes

Section 7093 of D.C. Law 17-219 repealed section 11 of D.C. Law 17-197.